Florida, session 2026, SB402.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 11 775.085, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 775.085âEvidencing prejudice while committing offense; 13 reclassification.â 14 (1)(a)âThe penalty for any felony or misdemeanor shall be 15 reclassified as provided in this subsection if the commission of 16 such felony or misdemeanor evidences prejudice based on the 17 race, color, ancestry, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, 18 national origin, homeless status, or advanced age, or political 19 ideology of the victim: 20 1.âA misdemeanor of the second degree is reclassified to a 21 misdemeanor of the first degree. 22 2.âA misdemeanor of the first degree is reclassified to a 23 felony of the third degree. 24 3.âA felony of the third degree is reclassified to a felony 25 of the second degree. 26 4.âA felony of the second degree is reclassified to a 27 felony of the first degree. 28 5.âA felony of the first degree is reclassified to a life 29 felony. 30 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.